Hawaii statutes.
§489E-3 Scope. (a) This chapter shall
apply to electronic records and electronic signatures relating to a
transaction.

(b) This chapter does not apply to a
transaction to the extent it is governed by:

(1) A law governing the creation and execution of
wills, codicils, or testamentary trusts;

(2) The Uniform Commercial Code other than section
490:1-201, article 2, and article 2A; and

(3) A law or rule governing notice of:

[(A)] Default, including but not limited to
notices relating to acceleration, repossession, eviction, foreclosure, or the
right to cure;

[(B)] Utility shutoff, including water,
telephone, gas and electricity; or

[(C)] Cancellation, termination, lapse, or
material alteration of a contract of insurance, insurance benefits, life settlement
or viatical settlement agreement, or service contract.

(c) This chapter applies to an electronic
record or electronic signature otherwise excluded from the application of this
chapter under subsection (b) when used for a transaction subject to a law other
than those specified in subsection (b).

(d) A transaction subject to this chapter is
also subject to other applicable substantive law. [L 2000, c 282, pt of §1; am
L 2004, c 162, §3; am L 2008, c 19, §78]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next